Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5258.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 15-3 of the General Laws entitled "Solemnization of Marriages" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
15-3-5.1. Common law marriage abolished.
(a) No common law marriage may be entered into in this state on or after January 1, 2026.
(b) An otherwise valid common law marriage entered into or adjudicated to exist before
January 1, 2026 shall continue to be valid in this state.
SECTION 2. Section 15-1-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 15-1 entitled "Persons Eligible
to Marry" is hereby amended to read as follows:
15-1-7. Marriage codification.
Marriage is the legally recognized union of two (2) people. Terms relating to the marital
relationship or familial relationships shall be construed consistently with this section for all
purposes throughout the law, whether in the context of statute, administrative or court rule, policy,
common law, or any other source of civil law.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000960
========